Hawaii statutes.
[§236D-4] Nonresidents; tax imposed;
exemption. (a) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on the transfer of the taxable estate located in Hawaii of every
nonresident.

(b) The tax shall be computed by multiplying
the federal credit by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the
property located in Hawaii, and the denominator of which is the value of the
decedent's gross estate.

(c) The transfer of the property of a
nonresident is exempt from the tax imposed by this section to the extent that
the property of residents is exempt from taxation under the laws of the state
in which the nonresident is domiciled, except that:

(1) Real property having an actual situs in this
State, whether or not held in a trust the corpus of which is included in a
decedent's gross estate for federal estate tax purposes;

(2) A beneficial interest in a land trust which owns
real property located in the State; and

(3) Tangible personal property having an actual situs
in this State;

shall be subject to tax under this section. [L 1983,
c 217, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next